Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB233.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 367.620 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 367.620 to 367.628:
(1) "Contractor":
(a) Means a person in the business of contracting, or offering to contract, to provide goods or services
relating to real estate; and
(b) Includes any person that directly or indirectly solicits or offers a real estate goods or services
contract;
(2) "Goods or services relating to real estate":
(a) Means goods, services, or goods and services relating to real estate; and
(b) Includes any:
1. Repair, replacement, construction, reconstruction, or improvement of real estate; and
2. Tree or debris removal;
(3) "Insured" means a person that is entitled, or may be entitled, to receive benefits or payments under a
property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy;
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 367.110;
(5) "[Residential ]Real estate":
(a) Means any parcel of real estate located in this state that is used for any purpose; and
(b) Includes:
1. Residential real estate; and
2. Commercial real estate[a new or existing building constructed for habitation by one (1) to four
(4) families, including detached garages]; and
(6)[(2)] "Real estate goods or services contract" means a contract for the provision of goods or services
relating to real estate, where the goods or services are expected to be paid from property, casualty, or
property and casualty insurance proceeds["Roof system" means the components of a roof to include but not
be limited to covering, framing, insulation, sheathing, ventilation, and weatherproofing; and
(3) "Roofing contractor" means a person or entity in the business of contracting or offering to contract with an
owner of residential real estate to repair or replace a roof system].
Section 2. KRS 367.622 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who[, on or after July 12, 2012,] enters into a real estate goods or services[a] contract with a[
roofing] contractor[ to provide goods or services related to a roof system of residential real estate, where the
goods or services are expected to be paid from the proceeds of a property and casualty insurance policy,] may
cancel the contract prior to midnight of the fifth business day after the person has received written notice from
the insurer that all or part of the claim is not a covered loss under the[ property and casualty] insurance policy.
(2) Cancellation shall be deemed to have occurred when the person does any of the following:[either ]
(a) Personally delivers written notice of cancellation to the[ roofing] contractor;
(b) Deposits[ the] written notice of cancellation in the United States mail, postage prepaid, and addressed to
the[ roofing] contractor at the address stated in the contract; or[, ]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Transmits[If applicable, at the time] notice of cancellation[ is transmitted] to the[ roofing] contractor by
facsimile or email[at the time an e-mail notice of cancellation is sent].
(3) Notice of cancellation[ given by the person] need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by
any form of written or recorded expression the intention of the person not to be bound by the contract.
Section 3. KRS 367.624 is amended to read as follows:
Prior to entering into a real estate goods or services[a] contract with any person[on or after July 12, 2012, for the
provision of goods or services relating to the repair or replacement of any part of a roof system of residential real
estate as provided in KRS 367.622], a[ roofing] contractor shall furnish the person[owner of the residential real
estate] with:
(1) The mailing address of the[ roofing] contractor through which written communication may be received;
(2) The telephone number of the[ roofing] contractor and, if applicable, the contractor's facsimile number and
email[e-mail] address;
(3) A statement in at least ten (10) point boldface type that states:
"You may cancel this contract at any time before midnight on the fifth business day after you have received
written notification from the[your] insurer that all or any part of the contracted goods, services, or goods and
services[claim or contract] is not a covered loss under the property, casualty, or property and casualty
insurance policy. This right to cancel is in addition to any other rights of cancellation you may have under state
or federal law or regulation. See the attached Notice of Cancellation form for an explanation of this right.";
and
(4) A fully completed form in duplicate, under the conspicuous caption "NOTICE OF CANCELLATION," and
attached to but easily detachable from the contract, in at least ten (10) point boldface type that shall read as
follows:
"NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
.......................................................
(enter date of transaction)
If you are notified by the[your] insurer that all or any part of the contracted goods, services, or goods and
services[claim or contract] is not a covered loss under the property, casualty, or property and casualty
insurance policy, you may cancel this contract without penalty or monetary obligation before midnight of the
fifth business day after you have received the notice[ from your insurer]. To cancel this transaction, you may
use any of the following methods: mail or otherwise deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation
notice, or any other written notice of cancellation which you sign and date, to (enter physical address of[
roofing] contractor), or email[e-mail] a notice of cancellation to (enter email[e-mail] address of[ roofing]
contractor), or transmit a notice of cancellation to (enter facsimile number of[ roofing] contractor), not later
than midnight of the fifth day after you receive notice from the[your] insurer.
I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION.
........................................................
(Date)
........................................................
(Buyer's Signature)"
Section 4. KRS 367.626 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "emergency goods or services" means goods, services, or goods and services to
immediately respond to a sudden, unexpected occurrence that poses a clear and imminent danger requiring
immediate action to prevent or mitigate the loss or impairment of life, health, property, or essential public
services.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:[, on or after July 12, 2012, ]
(a) A[ roofing] contractor shall:
1. Not require any advance payments under a real estate goods or services[a] contract[ for the
repair or replacement of any part of a roof system of residential real estate when payment is

CHAPTER 15 3
expected to be made from the proceeds of a property or casualty insurance policy] until the
cancellation period[, as] provided in KRS 367.622[,] has expired; and[.]
2.[(2)] Tender to the payor any payments, partial payments, or deposits made, and any note or other
evidence of indebtedness provided, to the contractor under a real estate goods or services
contract within ten (10) days after the[a] contract has been cancelled under[as provided in] KRS
367.622[, a roofing contractor shall tender to the payor any payments, partial payments, or
deposits made, and any note or other evidence of indebtedness, except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section];
(b) Any provision contained in a real estate goods or services contract that requires the payment of any
fee shall not be enforceable against any person who has cancelled the contract under Section 2 of
this Act; and
(c) Any real estate goods or services contract that contains a price that violates KRS 367.374 shall not be
enforceable.
(3) A[ roofing] contractor that provides[performs] any repair services or emergency goods or services authorized
under a real estate goods or services contract that has been cancelled under Section 2 of this Act[by the
owner of residential real estate], including but not limited to repair services necessary to prevent further
damage to the premises, shall be entitled to collect a reasonable and customary amount for the goods, services,
or goods and services provided[the repair services performed].[
(4) Any provision in a contract executed on or after July 12, 2012, for the repair of a roof system of residential
real estate, as provided in KRS 367.620 to 367.628, that requires the payment of any fee, except for repair
services performed under subsection (3) of this section, shall not be enforceable against any person who has
cancelled a contract under KRS 367.622.]
Section 5. KRS 367.627 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person may maintain an action to enjoin the continuing of any act in violation of KRS 367.620 to
367.628 and, if injured by the act, may also maintain an action for the recovery of damages.
(b) If the court finds based on evidence presented by the plaintiff that the defendant is violating or has
violated any of the provisions of KRS 367.620 to 367.628, the court shall enjoin the defendant from
continuing the violations.
(c) It shall not be necessary that actual economic damages be alleged or proved by the plaintiff in order for
the court to enjoin violations.
(d)[(2)] In addition to injunctive relief and any other relief the plaintiff may be entitled to under this
section:[, ]
1. The plaintiff in the action shall be entitled to recover from the defendant two (2) times the
amount of any actual economic damages sustained; and[.]
2.[(3)] The court may award the plaintiff reasonable attorneys' fees and costs[ to the owner of
residential real estate who prevails in an action under subsection (1) of this section, in addition to
any other relief the residential real estate owner may be entitled to under this section].
(2)[(4)] In addition to the remedies provided under subsection (1)[provisions] of this section:[, ]
(a) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to[for] the Attorney General under KRS 367.110 to
367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS 367.990,[by this chapter] shall apply with equal force and
effect to any act declared unlawful by KRS 367.620 to 367.628; and
(b) The Attorney General may recover a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation
against any person who violates any provision of KRS 367.620 to 367.628.
(3)[(5)] Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Attorney General or any other[a] person from pursuing the
recovery of damages afforded elsewhere under the law.
Section 6. KRS 367.628 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, a[ roofing] contractor, or person
representing a contractor, shall not represent, negotiate, or advertise to represent or negotiate on behalf
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
of any insured[an owner of residential real estate] on any insurance claim in connection with the
provision of goods or services relating to real estate[the repair or replacement of a roof system].
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a[ roofing] contractor, or person representing
a contractor, from:
1.[(a)] Providing an estimate for the provision of goods or services relating to[repair, replacement,
construction, or reconstruction of the property to the owner of residential] real estate; or
2.[(b)] Conferring with an insurance company's representative about damage to real estate[the property]
after a claim has been submitted by an insured[the owner of residential real estate].
(c) This subsection shall not apply to a public adjuster licensed under Subtitle 9 of KRS Chapter 304.
(2) Where[ the] goods or services relating to real estate are expected to be paid from property, casualty, or
property and casualty insurance[the] proceeds[ of a property and casualty policy], a[ roofing] contractor or
person representing a[ roofing] contractor shall not:
(a) Cause damage to any part of the real estate[a roof system] in order to increase the scope of goods or
services provided[repair or replacement], or encourage a person to cause damage to any part of the real
estate[a roof system] in order to secure a contract for goods or services[repair or replacement];
(b) Offer to pay or rebate all or any portion of an insurance deductible or claims proceeds as an inducement
to the sale of goods or services by a contractor[related to a residential roof contract];
(c) Grant an allowance or discount against the fee to be charged by a contractor[under the contract];[ or]
(d) Pay or offer to pay the insured,[owner of residential real estate] or his or her representative, for whom
services have been or will be performed[ pursuant to KRS 367.620 to 367.628], for any reason, any
form of compensation in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), including but not limited to a:
1. Bonus;
2. Coupon;
3. Credit;
4. Gift;
5. Prize;
6. Referral fee; or
7. Any other item having a monetary value; or
(e) File or claim a mechanic's lien pursuant to KRS 376.010 against an insured by reason of the
insured's failure or refusal to pay any excess charge over and above the amount paid or expected to
be paid by an insurer under a property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 367.620 TO 367.628 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In the event of a conflict between KRS 367.620 to 367.628 and any other law, KRS 367.620 to 367.628 shall
control.
Section 8. KRS 371.160 is amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in KRS 367.620 to 367.628:
(1) If, in any contract in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more involving the
improvement of real estate, a certain amount or percentage of the contract is held back by the owner, that
retained amount shall be deposited in a separate escrow account with a bank or trust company authorized to do
business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;[.]
(2) As of the time of the deposit of the retained funds, they shall become the sole and separate property of the
contractor to whom they are owed;[.]
(3) The escrow agent shall promptly invest all escrowed principal in obligations selected by the escrow agent in its
discretion;[.]

CHAPTER 15 5
(4) Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, to be evidenced by a written release by the owner, all funds
accumulated in the escrow account, together with any interest thereon, shall be paid immediately to the
contractor to whom it is owed;[.]
(5) The escrow agent shall be compensated for its services in an amount agreed to by the owner, contractor, and
escrow agent. The compensation shall be a commercially reasonable fee commensurate with fees being
charged for handling of escrow accounts of similar size and duration. The compensation shall be paid from the
escrow account;[.]
(6) In the event the owner fails or refuses to execute the release provided for in subsection (4) of this section, then
the contractor shall have a cause of action against the owner in a court of proper jurisdiction; and[.]
(7) This section shall not apply to contracts with the Commonwealth, any county, charter county, urban-county
government, or municipality, or any other political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the
Commonwealth, or school boards.
Section 9. KRS 371.425 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (3), [and ](4), and (5) of this section, KRS 371.400 to 371.425 shall apply to
public construction and public works projects, and to private construction, excluding residential construction.
(2) KRS 371.400 to 371.425 shall apply to construction contracts entered into after June 26, 2007.
(3) KRS 371.400 to 371.425 shall not apply to contracts entered into by a borrower of funds that are provided,
insured, or guaranteed by the United States Department of Agriculture's Rural Utilities Service, or financed
under a lien accommodation by the Rural Utilities Service.
(4) KRS 371.400 to 371.425 shall not apply to any contract for construction of or relating to any facility as
defined in KRS Chapter 278.
(5) In the event of a conflict between KRS 371.400 to 371.425 and KRS 367.620 to 367.628, KRS 367.620 to
367.628 shall control.
Section 10. This Act applies to contracts entered on or after the effective date of this Act.
Signed by Governor March 15, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version